Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.23, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exposure of human breast. new text end new text begin Exposure of a human breast alone does not constitute lewd exposure, gross lewdness, or lascivious behavior. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end